Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB763.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 336 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act:
(1) "Apprentice" means a person employed by a public water or wastewater system
who is enrolled in a registered apprenticeship program for water systems
operations specialists or wastewater systems operations specialists, who has
entered into a voluntary written agreement with the registered apprenticeship
program sponsor, and that agreement has been submitted to the United States
Department of Labor's Office of Apprenticeship and the Kentucky Apprenticeship
Council;
(2) "Cabinet" means the Education and Labor Cabinet;
(3) "Employer" means any person or organization employing an apprentice whether
or not the employer is a party to an apprenticeship agreement or on-the-job
training agreement with the apprentice;
(4) "Kentucky FLOW Program" means the Kentucky Future Leaders of Water
Program established in Section 2 of this Act;
(5) "Public water or wastewater system" means:
(a) A water district or joint water commission formed under KRS Chapter 74;
(b) A water association formed as a nonprofit corporation under KRS Chapter
273;
(c) A sewer district, sanitation district, or joint sewer agency formed under KRS
Chapter 65, 67, 76, or 220;
(d) A regional wastewater commission formed under KRS Chapter 65;
(e) A municipal water utility or water works, sewer utility, sewage system or
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1393
works, or combined electric and water plant formed under KRS Chapter 96;
or
(f) A nonprofit corporation created under KRS 58.180 to act as an
instrumentality of one (1) or more governmental agencies in the acquisition
and financing of public projects, including water or sewer systems;
(6) "Registered apprenticeship program" means a program registered with the
United States Department of Labor's Office of Apprenticeship and the Kentucky
Apprenticeship Council established in KRS 343.020, and which meets the
standards set forth in 29 C.F.R. pts. 29 and 30, as evidenced by a certificate of
registration or other official documentation;
(7) "Related technical instruction" means an organized and systematic form of
instruction designed to provide the apprentice or trainee with knowledge of the
theoretical and technical subjects related to the apprentice's occupation in
accordance with the approved registered apprenticeship program standards; and
(8) "Sponsor" means any person, committee, or organization under whose name or
title the registered apprenticeship program is registered, regardless of whether
such an entity is an employer.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 336 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky FLOW Program is hereby established to provide an orderly process
for eligible public water or wastewater systems to apply for and receive funds to:
(a) Support up to fifty (50) employees of public water or wastewater systems
each program year in obtaining a voluntary utility manager accreditation
from the Division of Enforcement within the Energy and Environment
Cabinet;
(b) Support up to fifty (50) new or continuing apprenticeship placements each
program year for apprentices in a registered apprenticeship program;
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1393
(c) Strengthen public water or wastewater system leadership capacity; and
(d) Improve public health, protection, and environmental compliance, while
safeguarding the Commonwealth's investments in capital water and
wastewater infrastructure projects.
(2) The cabinet shall administer a reimbursement program for public water or
wastewater systems that sponsor employees who enroll in and successfully
complete the Kentucky Division of Enforcement's voluntary utility manager
accreditation. Reimbursements shall be applied for and disbursed as follows:
(a) An eligible public water or wastewater system may receive reimbursement of
documented training, tuition, registration, materials, exam costs, and
reasonable travel expenses incurred on behalf of an employee completing
the accreditation, up to a maximum of two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500) per employee;
(b) A public water or wastewater system shall apply for reimbursement on
behalf of an employee and must demonstrate that the employee successfully
completed the accreditation requirements;
(c) The cabinet shall publish application procedures and may disburse
reimbursement upon proof of employee completion and submission of
supporting documentation; and
(d) The cabinet may reserve up to fifty (50) reimbursement awards per year.
(3) (a) The cabinet shall administer a reimbursement program for public water or
wastewater systems that sponsor employees who enroll in a registered
apprenticeship program for water systems operations specialists or
wastewater systems operations specialists.
(b) Subject to available funds, the cabinet may award to eligible public water or
wastewater systems sponsoring or employing apprentices:
1. Wage reimbursement up to fifty percent (50%) of the apprentice's
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1393
hourly wage, capped at eight dollars ($8) per hour and two thousand
(2,000) hours per year, for a maximum of sixteen thousand dollars
($16,000) per apprentice per program year, disbursed quarterly upon
receipt of payroll records;
2. Reimbursement for related technical instruction tuition, fees,
textbooks, and training provider costs, up to two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500) per apprentice per program year, disbursed
upon documented expense;
3. Reimbursement for licensure and testing, including exam fees, license
fees, and preparatory courses for the Division of Water's Kentucky
operator credentials, up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per
apprentice, per program year, disbursed upon documented expense;
4. Mentor stipends up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per apprentice
per program year, to be paid to a qualified certified operator or
supervisor of a public water or wastewater system who provides on-
the-job training and competency sign-offs, disbursed quarterly upon
receipt of payroll records;
5. Reimbursement for essential safety gear, basic tools, and required
travel to related technical instruction, up to one thousand five hundred
dollars ($1,500) per apprentice per program year, disbursed upon
documented expense; and
6. Program administration, outreach, technical assistance to
apprenticeship program sponsors, program evaluation, and data
reporting, in an amount up to ten percent (10%) of annual
appropriations, disbursed upon documented expense.
(c) To receive funding under this subsection, a public water or wastewater
system shall:
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1393
1. Be registered with the Secretary of State, if applicable, and be in good
standing;
2. Have a valid employer acceptance agreement on file with a registered
apprenticeship program sponsor;
3. Employ or sponsor apprentices in a registered apprenticeship program
approved by the Kentucky Energy and Environment Cabinet;
4. Pay apprentices no less than the wage schedule set forth in the
registered apprenticeship program standards; and
5. Comply with the regulations set forth in 29 C.F.R. pt. 30, as amended,
and in KRS Chapter 344.
(d) Awards shall be made pursuant to a reimbursement agreement between the
cabinet and the public water or wastewater system that includes at a
minimum, the name of the apprentice supported by the award, the expected
reimbursement for each relevant criteria in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, reporting requirements, and terms for forfeiture and repayment
of award funds for noncompliance with the reimbursement agreement.
(e) In scoring funding applications, the cabinet shall consider:
1. Workforce need and public benefit;
2. Public water or wastewater system size and financial capacity;
3. Geographic balance between applicants;
4. Quality of the registered apprenticeship program design, with
particular emphasis on a proven record of successful implementation,
performance outcomes, and measurable results;
5. Retention and progression plans of the public water or wastewater
system; and
6. Partnerships with the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System, the Department of Education's Office of Career and
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1393
Technical Education, industry associations, and workforce boards.
(f) Priority for funding may be given to public water or wastewater systems
serving disadvantaged communities, those currently experiencing a
workforce shortage or that have submitted an alternative staffing plan to the
Division of Water, or those that have received a notice of violation or
entered into an agreed order arising from noncompliance with the Safe
Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 300f et. seq., or the Clean Water Act, 33
USC sec. 1251 et seq.
(4) On or before September 1, 2026, and each September 1 thereafter, the cabinet
shall publish an annual notice of funding and a standard application for the
Kentucky FLOW program on the cabinet's website.
(5) On or before September 1, 2027, and each September 1 thereafter, the cabinet
shall publish an annual report of the Kentucky FLOW program covering the
preceding fiscal year, including:
(a) The number of apprentices and sponsors;
(b) The regional distribution of grant awards;
(c) Completion and retention rates for the apprenticeship programs;
(d) Award funds obligated and expended by category; and
(e) Completion outcomes relative to selection criteria.
(6) The cabinet may audit recipients and shall recover improper payments as
established in a reimbursement agreement or by administrative regulations.
(7) The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to give effect to the Kentucky FLOW program and Sections 1 to 3 of
this Act.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 336 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a restricted fund to be known as
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1393
the Kentucky FLOW Program fund. The fund shall consist of moneys received
from state appropriations, federal funds, gifts, grants, civil penalties collected by
the cabinet, and any federal funds.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the cabinet consistent with this chapter and
KRS Chapter 343 and the administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for administering the Kentucky
FLOW Program established in Section 2 of this Act and for no other purpose.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of the
fiscal year shall not lapse but be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(5) Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not
lapse.
Section 4. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$1,347,500 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium, and thereafter subject to
biennial appropriation, to the Kentucky FLOW Program Fund established in Section 3 of
this Act to provide funding for the purposes of the Kentucky FLOW Program.
Section 5. Whereas providing timely funding for the Kentucky FLOW Program
and public water and wastewater system apprenticeships is critically important, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:04 PM Jacketed